lrec2010_examples/Noungen.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +N +mas +fem +sg +pl ^GN1 ^GN2 ^GN3 ^GN4
LEXICON Root

^GN1 Noun1;
^GN2 Noun2;
^GN3 Noun3;
^GN4 Noun4;

!Nouns ending in o
LEXICON Noun1
+N+mas:0   Npl;

!Nouns ending in a
LEXICON Noun2
+N+fem:0   Npl;


!Nouns ending in ción
LEXICON Noun3
+N+fem:0 Npl;

!Nouns ending every other way
Lexicon Noun4
+N:0 Npl;

!Nouns ending in ma,pa,ta should be put in a seperate lexicon

LEXICON Npl
+sg:0 #;
+pl:^s  #;
